Minnesota, session 2025-2026, SF798.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin APPROPRIATION; HIRED.new text end new text begin $700,000 in fiscal year 2026 and $700,000 in fiscal year 2027 are appropriated from the workforce development fund to the commissioner of employment and economic development for a grant to Hired to support their workforce development programming and services. Grant proceeds may be used to expand their career pathway job training and placement program that connects lower-skilled job seekers to entry-level and gateway jobs in high-growth sectors. Grant proceeds may also be used to create services for low-income Minnesotans designed to increase job retention and create a more stable workforce for employers by offering a continuum of employment coaching, navigation, and support services to economically disadvantaged employees. These are onetime appropriations. new text end